Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2606
Records; maintenance and location.

Every record required to be maintained pursuant to sections 60-2602 to 60-2604 shall be maintained by such a wrecker or salvage dealer in the ordinary course of business and shall be maintained for five years at the principal place of business of such wrecker or salvage dealer, in such a manner that, upon request during regular business hours by any designated peace officer or investigator employed by the board, such wrecker or salvage dealer shall be able, within a reasonable time, not exceeding twelve hours, to furnish the information requested.

Laws 1983, LB 234, § 26.